Wisconsin, session 2025, SB71.
do enact as follows:SB71,11Section 1. 14.833 of the statutes is created to read:SB71,2,7214.833 Dietitian licensure compact. There is created a dietitian licensure 3compact commission as specified in s. 448.9887. The delegate on the commission 4representing this state shall be appointed by the dietitian affiliated credentialing 5board as provided in s. 448.9887 (8) (b) 1. and shall be an individual described in s. 6448.9887 (8) (b) 2. The commission has the powers and duties granted and imposed 7under s. 448.9887.SB71,28Section 2. 146.81 (1) (em) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,2,109146.81 (1) (em) A dietitian who is certified under subch. V of ch. 448 or who 10holds a compact privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB71,311Section 3. 146.997 (1) (d) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,2,1312146.997 (1) (d) 6. A dietitian who is certified under subch. V of ch. 448 or who 13holds a compact privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB71,414Section 4. 252.14 (1) (ar) 4m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,2,1615252.14 (1) (ar) 4m. A dietitian who is certified under subch. V of ch. 448 or 16who holds a compact privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB71,517Section 5. 253.065 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,2,2218253.065 (3) Unless the department grants an exception, in order to be eligible 19for the internship program under sub. (1), an applicant must, at the time of his or 20her selection, be employed as a nutritionist for the supplemental food program for 21women, infants, and children under s. 253.06 by either the department or a local 22agency and have met the educational requirements under s. 448.78 (3) (1m) (c).SB71,623Section 6. 253.065 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,3,61253.065 (5) The department shall issue to each individual who successfully 2completes the dietetic internship program under this section a certificate of 3completion that the individual may submit as verification of the completion of more 4than 900 hours of qualifying dietetics practice under s. 448.78 (4) (1m) (d). The 5dietitians affiliated credentialing board shall accept certificates of completion 6issued under this subsection as satisfactory evidence under s. 448.78 (4) (1m) (d).SB71,77Section 7. 440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,3,128440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) Subject to pars. (b) and (c) and s. 458.33 (2) (b) and (5), 9the department shall, biennially, determine each fee for an initial credential for 10which no examination is required, for a reciprocal credential, and for a credential 11renewal and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 448.986 (2), 448.9875 (2), 12448.9885 (2), 448.9888 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2) by doing all of the following:SB71,813Section 8. 440.03 (9) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,4,514440.03 (9) (a) 2. Not later than January 31 of each odd-numbered year, 15adjusting for the succeeding fiscal biennium each fee for an initial credential for 16which an examination is not required, for a reciprocal credential, and, subject to s. 17440.08 (2) (a), for a credential renewal, and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 18448.986 (2), 448.9875 (2), 448.9885 (2), 448.9888 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2), if an 19adjustment is necessary to reflect the approximate administrative and enforcement 20costs of the department that are attributable to the regulation of the particular 21occupation or business during the period in which the initial or reciprocal 22credential, credential renewal, or compact privilege is in effect and, for purposes of 23each fee for a credential renewal, to reflect an estimate of any additional moneys 1available for the department’s general program operations as a result of 2appropriation transfers that have been or are estimated to be made under s. 20.165 3(1) (i) during the fiscal biennium in progress at the time of the deadline for an 4adjustment under this subdivision or during the fiscal biennium beginning on the 5July 1 immediately following the deadline for an adjustment under this subdivision.SB71,96Section 9. 440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. of the statutes is created to read:SB71,4,87440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. The coordinated data system under s. 448.9887 (9), if 8such disclosure is required under the dietitian licensure compact under s. 448.9887.SB71,109Section 10. 440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) of the statutes, is amended to read:SB71,4,1810440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) The department may investigate whether an applicant 11for or holder of any of the following credentials has been charged with or convicted 12of a crime only pursuant to rules promulgated by the department under this 13paragraph, including rules that establish the criteria that the department will use 14to determine whether an investigation under this paragraph is necessary, except as 15provided in par. (c) and ss. 441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 16448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 5. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9887 (3) 17(b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., and 18459.70 (3) (b) 2.:SB71,1119Section 11. 440.03 (13) (c) 1. gm. of the statutes is created to read:SB71,4,2220440.03 (13) (c) 1. gm. An applicant for a dietitian compact privilege under s. 21448.9887 (4) and an applicant for a dietitian certificate described in s. 448.9887 (5) 22(b) 2. a.SB71,1223Section 12. 440.15 of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,5,81440.15 No fingerprinting. Except as provided under ss. 440.03 (13) (c), 2441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 35. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9887 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 450.071 (3) 4(c) 9., 450.075 (3) (c) 9., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 5and 459.70 (3) (b) 1., the department or a credentialing board may not require that 6an applicant for a credential or a credential holder be fingerprinted or submit 7fingerprints in connection with the department’s or the credentialing board’s 8credentialing.SB71,139Section 13. 446.01 (1v) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,5,1210446.01 (1v) (f) Dietitians affiliated credentialing board under subch. V of ch. 11448. “Health care professional” also includes an individual who holds a compact 12privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB71,1413Section 14. 446.02 (6m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,5,1914446.02 (6m) No chiropractor may provide counsel, direction, guidance, advice, 15or a recommendation to a patient regarding the health effects of vitamins, herbs, or 16nutritional supplements unless the chiropractor has been issued a certificate under 17sub. (2) (c) 1. This subsection does not apply to a chiropractor licensed under this 18chapter who is a certified as a dietitian under subch. V of ch. 448, as defined in s. 19448.70 (1m).SB71,1520Section 15. 448.70 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,5,2221448.70 (1m) “Certified dietitian” means an individual who is certified as a 22dietitian under this subchapter or who holds a compact privilege.SB71,1623Section 16. 448.70 (1r) of the statutes is created to read:SB71,6,21448.70 (1r) “Compact” means the dietitian licensure compact under s. 2448.9887.SB71,173Section 17. 448.70 (1s) of the statutes is created to read:SB71,6,64448.70 (1s) “Compact privilege” means a compact privilege, as defined in s. 5448.9887 (2) (i), that is granted under the compact to an individual to practice in 6this state.SB71,187Section 18. 448.72 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,6,128448.72 (6) Prohibit an individual from using the title “dietitian”, “dietitian,” 9“licensed dietitian,” or “certified dietitian” if the person is licensed or certified as a 10dietitian under the laws of another state which has licensure or certification 11requirements that the affiliated credentialing board determines to be substantially 12equivalent to the requirements under s. 448.78 (1m).SB71,1913Section 19. 448.74 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB71,6,1514448.74 (1) Establish criteria for the approval of educational programs and 15training under s. 448.78 (3) and (4) (1m) (c) and (d).SB71,2016Section 20. 448.78 (title) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb71 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb71 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB71 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB71 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB71: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting